District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.03

Addresses in filings.

If a provision of this subchapter other than § 29-104.10(a)(4) requires that a record state an address, the record shall state a:

(1)

Street address in the District; and

(2)

Mailing address in the District, if different from the address described in paragraph (1) of this section.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720